District of Columbia statutes.
20-534

Termination of appointment.

The appointment of a special administrator terminates either upon the appointment of a personal representative or in the same manner provided in subchapter III of this chapter for the suspension and termination of a personal representative.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 20-534.